Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.094

Cargo extension.

"Cargo extension" means a device that connects to the left and right side of a motor home or travel trailer frame and (1) becomes part of the frame, (2) does not pivot on a hitch, and (3) has an axle with two wheels, acting as a tag axle, to safely carry the weight of the cargo.

[ 2016 c 22 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 22: "It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that a cargo-carrying extension on the rear of a motor home or travel trailer must safely carry the weight of the cargo by requiring, if necessary, that the unit have an axle and two wheels, acting as a tag axle, to accommodate the weight and size of the cargo." [ 2016 c 22 s 1.]

Effective date—2016 c 22: "This act takes effect July 1, 2016." [ 2016 c 22 s 8.]